Hawaii statutes.
§94-4 Certificate to same. The
comptroller of the State and the state archivist or other officer performing
the duties of state archivist or custodian of the state archives are severally
authorized and empowered to certify, as true and correct, copies or
reproductions of any of the documents, papers, writings, or other government
records, or excerpts therefrom in their custody. Fees for copying,
certification, and other services shall be prescribed by the comptroller in
direct relation to the cost of the services.

The above fees shall not be charged where the
work involved is required by any department or branch of the federal, state, or
county governments. [L 1909, c 8, §2; RL 1925, §2603; am L 1932 2d, c 21, §1;
RL 1935, §3842; RL 1945, §9890; am L 1945, c 109, §1; am L 1953, c 159, §1; RL
1955, §224-11; am L 1957, c 83, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §12; HRS §94-4; am L
2013, c 88, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next